Louisiana, session 2026, SB396.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Children's Code Art. 906(B)(1) and (3) are hereby amended and reenacted
and Children's Code Art. 906(B)(5) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 906. Required review hearings; commitment; children in custody of the office
of juvenile justice
* * *
B.(1) Any child committed by a court to the custody of the office of juvenile
justice must shall be physically transported to the committing court for an in-person
review hearing not more than six months after the child's commitment, and every six
months thereafter, unless such an in-person hearing is waived by counsel for the
child and by the committing court. The date of the initial review hearing shall be set
by the court at the time of disposition. The court may order review hearings set
more frequently than the in-person hearings every six months, but for such
additional hearings the child shall participate via a video conferencing platform.
Staff of the office of juvenile justice and contract staff shall participate in each
review hearing in the same manner as the child who is required to participate
in accordance with this Subparagraph.
* * *
(3) For the purposes of this Paragraph, a child is deemed "committed by a
court to the custody of the office of juvenile justice" if he is judicially committed to
the legal custody of the office of juvenile justice, regardless of where the child is
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 396 ENROLLED
physically held, including but not limited to state-run secure facilities, state-run
nonsecure facilities, private facilities with which the office of juvenile justice
contracts, and juvenile detention centers.
* * *
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any child
committed by a court to the custody of the office of juvenile justice shall have
the right to participate in a private and confidential virtual consultation with
his counsel of record prior to any review hearing or other proceeding. The
consultation shall be conducted through a secure video conferencing platform
that ensures end-to-end confidentiality.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.